Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-210
Board of trustees; ordinances; publication; chairperson pro tempore.

The chairperson of the village board of trustees shall cause the ordinances of the village to be printed and published for the information of the inhabitants and cause such ordinances to be carried into effect. In the absence of the chairperson from any meeting of the village board of trustees, the village board of trustees shall have power to appoint a chairperson pro tempore, who shall exercise and have the powers and perform the same duties as the regular chairperson.

Laws 1879, § 49, p. 204;

R.S.1913, § 5060;

C.S.1922, § 4232;

C.S.1929, § 17-210;

R.S.1943, § 17-210;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 73.